Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-216 Additional contents. A
policy may contain additional provisions, which are not inconsistent with this
part, and which are:

(1) Required to be inserted by the laws of the
insurer's state of domicile; or

(2) Appropriate or necessary to state the rights and
obligations of the parties to the contract. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next